Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2605
Violations by packer; enforcement; penalty.

Whenever the Attorney General has reason to believe that a packer is violating section 54-2604, he or she shall commence an action in district court to enjoin the livestock operation. The court, upon determination that such packer is in violation of section 54-2604, shall order such livestock to be removed and sold and shall assess the packer a fine of not less than one thousand dollars for each day of violation.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 5.